Nebraska, session 109, LB210.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-2454, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-2454 (1) An entity described in section 71-2455 shall establish a
system of prescription drug monitoring for the purposes of (a) preventing
the misuse of controlled substances that are prescribed, (b) allowing
prescribers and dispensers to monitor the care and treatment of patients
for whom such a prescription drug is prescribed to ensure that such
prescription drugs are used for medically appropriate purposes, (c)
providing information to improve the health and safety of patients, and
(d) ensuring that the State of Nebraska remains on the cutting edge of
medical information technology.
(2) Such system of prescription drug monitoring shall be implemented
as follows: Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
prescription drug information shall be reported to the prescription drug
monitoring system. The prescription drug monitoring system shall include,
but not be limited to, provisions that:
(a) Prohibit any patient from opting out of the prescription drug
monitoring system;
(b) Require any prescription drug that is dispensed in this state or
to an address in this state to be entered into the system by the
dispenser or his or her delegate no less frequently than daily after such
prescription drug is sold, including prescription drugs for patients
paying cash or otherwise not relying on a third-party payor for payment,
except that prescriptions labeled "for emergency use" or "for use in
immunizations" are not required to be reported;
(c) Allow any prescriber or dispenser all prescribers or dispensers
of prescription drugs to access the system upon payment of any access fee
charged at no cost to such prescriber or dispenser;
(d) Ensure that such system includes information relating to all
payors, including, but not limited to, the medical assistance program
established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act; and
-2-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
(e) Make the prescription drug information available to the
statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455 for
access by its participants upon payment of any access fee charged if such
access is in compliance with the privacy and security protections set
forth in the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations
promulgated thereunder, except that if a patient opts out of the
statewide health information exchange, the prescription drug information
regarding that patient shall not be accessible by the participants in the
statewide health information exchange; and .
(f) Authorize the operator to charge for access fees.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
prescription drug information that shall be submitted electronically to
the prescription drug monitoring system shall be determined by the entity
described in section 71-2455 and shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The patient's name, address, telephone number, if a telephone
number is available, gender, and date of birth;
(b) A patient identifier such as a military identification number,
driver's license number, state identification card number, or other valid
government-issued identification number, insurance identification number,
pharmacy software-generated patient-specific identifier, or other
identifier associated specifically with the patient;
(c) The name and address of the pharmacy dispensing the prescription
drug;
(d) The date the prescription is issued;
(e) The date the prescription is filled;
(f) The date the prescription is sold to the patient;
(g) The number of refills authorized;
(h) The prescription number of the prescription drug;
(i) The National Drug Code number as published by the federal Food
and Drug Administration of the prescription drug;
-3-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
(j) The strength of the prescription drug prescribed;
(k) The quantity of the prescription drug prescribed and the number
of days' supply;
(l) The prescriber's name and National Provider Identifier number or
Drug Enforcement Administration number when reporting a controlled
substance; and
(m) Additional information as determined by the Health Information
Technology Board and as published in the submitter guide for the
prescription drug monitoring system.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, a veterinarian licensed under the
Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act shall be required to report
the dispensing of prescription drugs which are controlled substances
listed on Schedule II, Schedule III, Schedule IV, or Schedule V pursuant
to section 28-405. Each such veterinarian shall indicate that the
prescription is an animal prescription and shall include the following
information in such report:
(a) The first and last name and address, including city, state, and
zip code, of the individual to whom the prescription drug is dispensed in
accordance with a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship;
(b) Reporting status;
(c) The first and last name of the prescribing veterinarian and his
or her federal Drug Enforcement Administration number;
(d) The National Drug Code number as published by the federal Food
and Drug Administration of the prescription drug and the prescription
number;
(e) The date the prescription is written and the date the
prescription is filled;
(f) The number of refills authorized, if any; and
(g) The quantity of the prescription drug and the number of days'
supply.
(5)(a) All prescription drug information submitted pursuant to this
-4-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
section, all data contained in the prescription drug monitoring system,
and any report obtained from data contained in the prescription drug
monitoring system are confidential, are privileged, are not public
records, and may be withheld pursuant to section 84-712.05 except for
information released as provided in subsection (9) or (10) of this
section.
(b) No patient-identifying data as defined in section 81-664,
including the data collected under subsection (3) of this section, shall
be disclosed, made public, or released to any public or private person or
entity except to the statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455 and its participants, to prescribers and dispensers as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, or as provided in subsection
(7), (9), or (10) of this section.
(c) All other data is for the confidential use of the department and
the statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455
and its participants. The department, or the statewide health information
exchange in accordance with policies adopted by the Health Information
Technology Board and in collaboration with the department, may release
such information in accordance with the privacy and security provisions
set forth in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder,
as Class I, Class II, or Class IV data in accordance with section 81-667,
except for purposes in accordance with subsection (9) or (10) of this
section, to the private or public persons or entities that the department
or the statewide health information exchange, in accordance with policies
adopted by the Health Information Technology Board, determines may view
such records as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675. In addition, the
department, or the statewide health information exchange in accordance
with policies adopted by the Health Information Technology Board and in
collaboration with the department, may release such information as
provided in subsection (9) or (10) of this section.
-5-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
(6) The statewide health information exchange described in section
71-2455, in accordance with policies adopted by the Health Information
Technology Board and in collaboration with the department, shall
establish the minimum administrative, physical, and technical safeguards
necessary to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of
prescription drug information.
(7) If the entity receiving the prescription drug information has
privacy protections at least as restrictive as those set forth in this
section and has implemented and maintains the minimum safeguards required
by subsection (6) of this section, the statewide health information
exchange described in section 71-2455, in accordance with policies
adopted by the Health Information Technology Board and in collaboration
with the department, may release the prescription drug information and
any other data collected pursuant to this section to:
(a) Other state prescription drug monitoring programs;
(b) State and regional health information exchanges;
(c) The medical director and pharmacy director of the Division of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the department, or their designees;
(d) The medical directors and pharmacy directors of medicaid-managed
care entities, the state's medicaid drug utilization review board, and
any other state-administered health insurance program or its designee if
any such entities have a current data-sharing agreement with the
statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455, and
if such release is in accordance with the privacy and security provisions
of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191, and all regulations promulgated thereunder;
(e) Organizations which facilitate the interoperability and mutual
exchange of information among state prescription drug monitoring programs
or state or regional health information exchanges; or
(f) Electronic health record systems or pharmacy-dispensing software
systems for the purpose of integrating prescription drug information into
-6-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
a patient's medical record.
(8) The department, or the statewide health information exchange
described in section 71-2455, in accordance with policies adopted by the
Health Information Technology Board and in collaboration with the
department, may release to patients their prescription drug information
collected pursuant to this section. Upon request of the patient, such
information may be released directly to the patient or a personal health
record system designated by the patient which has privacy protections at
least as restrictive as those set forth in this section and that has
implemented and maintains the minimum safeguards required by subsection
(6) of this section.
(9) In accordance with the privacy and security provisions set forth
in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the
department, or the statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455 under policies adopted by the Health Information
Technology Board, may release data collected pursuant to this section for
statistical, public policy, or educational purposes after removing
information which identifies or could reasonably be used to identify the
patient, prescriber, dispenser, or other person who is the subject of the
information, except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this
section.
(10) In accordance with the privacy and security provisions set
forth in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the
department, or statewide health information exchange described in section
71-2455 under policies adopted by the Health Information Technology
Board, may release data collected pursuant to this section for quality
measures as approved or regulated by state or federal agencies or for
patient quality improvement or research initiatives approved by the
Health Information Technology Board.
-7-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
(11) The statewide health information exchange described in section
71-2455, entities described in subsection (7) of this section, or the
department may request and receive program information from other
prescription drug monitoring programs for use in the prescription drug
monitoring system in this state in accordance with the privacy and
security provisions set forth in the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations
promulgated thereunder.
(12) The statewide health information exchange described in section
71-2455, in collaboration with the department, shall implement
technological improvements to facilitate the secure collection of, and
access to, prescription drug information in accordance with this section.
(13)(a) (13) Before accessing the prescription drug monitoring
system, any user shall undergo training on the purpose of the system,
access to and proper usage of the system, and the law relating to the
system, including confidentiality and security of the prescription drug
monitoring system. Such training shall be administered by the statewide
health information exchange described in section 71-2455 or the
department. The statewide health information exchange described in
section 71-2455 shall have access to the prescription drug monitoring
system for training operations, maintenance, and administrative purposes.
Users who have been trained prior to May 10, 2017, or who are granted
access by an entity receiving prescription drug information pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section, are deemed to be in compliance with the
training requirement of this subsection.
(b) The operator may assess users of the prescription drug
monitoring system, other than pharmacy benefit managers, a fee for use of
the system. The operator may collect the fees and pursue legal action for
uncollected assessments. The operator may impose interest charges or
other penalties on a user that fails to pay an assessment in a timely
manner.
-8-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
(14) The department shall impose fees on every pharmacy benefit
manager for operational, nontreatment use of the prescription drug
monitoring system. The fee shall be XXX. The department shall remit the
fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Population Health
Information Assessment Fund.
(15) (14) For purposes of this section:
(a) Deliver or delivery means to actually, constructively, or
attempt to transfer a drug or device from one person to another, whether
or not for consideration;
(b) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(c) Delegate means any licensed or registered health care
professional credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act designated
by a prescriber or dispenser to act as an agent of the prescriber or
dispenser for purposes of submitting or accessing data in the
prescription drug monitoring system and who is supervised by such
prescriber or dispenser;
(d) Prescription drug or drugs means a prescription drug or drugs
dispensed by delivery to the ultimate user or caregiver by or pursuant to
the lawful order of a prescriber but does not include (i) the delivery of
such prescription drug for immediate use for purposes of inpatient
hospital care or emergency department care, (ii) the administration of a
prescription drug by an authorized person upon the lawful order of a
prescriber, (iii) a wholesale distributor of a prescription drug
monitored by the prescription drug monitoring system, or (iv) the
dispensing to a nonhuman patient of a prescription drug which is not a
controlled substance listed in Schedule II, Schedule III, Schedule IV, or
Schedule V of section 28-405;
(e) Dispenser means a person authorized in the jurisdiction in which
he or she is practicing to deliver a prescription drug to the ultimate
user or caregiver by or pursuant to the lawful order of a prescriber;
(f) Operator means the operator of the prescription drug monitoring
-9-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
system and the designated health information exchange;
(g) (f) Participant means an individual or entity that has entered
into a participation agreement with the statewide health information
exchange described in section 71-2455 which requires the individual or
entity to comply with the privacy and security protections set forth in
the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations
promulgated thereunder; and
(h) Pharmacy benefit manager means a person that negotiates
prescription drug price and rebate arrangements with manufacturers or
labelers of prescription drugs; and
(i) (g) Prescriber means a health care professional authorized to
prescribe in the profession which he or she practices.
Sec. 2. Section 81-6,123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,123 Sections 81-6,123 to 81-6,128 and sections 6 to 9 of this
act 81-6,126 shall be known and may be cited as the Population Health
Information Act.
Sec. 3. Section 81-6,124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,124 For purposes of the Population Health Information Act:
(1) Clinical information means information related to the diagnosis
and treatment of health conditions or services provided for health
conditions;
(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(3) Designated health information exchange means the statewide
health information exchange described in section 71-2455;
(4) Nonfederal costs means the costs of operating the designated
health information exchange and prescription drug monitoring program that
are not covered by federal reimbursement under the medical assistance
program;
-10-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
(5) (4) Health care entity means a health care facility as defined
in section 71-413, a home health agency as defined in section 71-417, an
urgent care treatment center, a laboratory, a medicaid managed care
organization, a federally qualified health center, a health care
practitioner facility as defined in section 71-414, a dental facility, a
local public health department, a health insurance carrier, or any other
organization or entity providing health care services in Nebraska;
(6) (5) Health care provider means a person practicing as a health
care professional under the Uniform Credentialing Act; and
(7) Operator means the operator of the prescription drug monitoring
program and the designated health information exchange; and
(8) (6) Prescription drug monitoring program means the program
created under section 71-2454.
Sec. 4. Section 81-6,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,125 (1) The purposes purpose of the Population Health
Information Act are is to designate a health information exchange to
provide the data infrastructure needed to assist in creating a healthier
Nebraska and operating the electronic health records initiative and to
provide for one or more assessments to be imposed to provide for
sustainability of the designated health information exchange and
prescription drug monitoring program.
(2) The designated health information exchange shall:
(a) Aggregate clinical information from health care entities needed
to support the operation of the medical assistance program under the
Medical Assistance Act;
(b) Act as the designated entity for purposes of access to and
analysis of health data;
(c) Collect and analyze data for purposes of informing the
Legislature, the department, health care providers, and health care
entities as to the cost of, access to, and quality of health care in
-11-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
Nebraska;
(d) Act as a collector and reporter of public health data for
registry submissions, electronic laboratory reporting, immunization
reporting, and syndromic surveillance from an electronic health record,
which does not include claims data; and
(e) Enable any health care provider or health care entity to access
information available within the designated health information exchange
to evaluate and monitor care and treatment of a patient in accordance
with the privacy and security provisions set forth in the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191.
(3)(a) On or before September 30, 2021, each health care facility
listed in subdivision (c) (b) of this subsection shall participate in the
designated health information exchange through sharing of clinical
information. Such clinical information shall include the clinical data
that the health care facility captured in its existing electronic health
record as permitted by state and federal laws, rules, and regulations.
Any patient health information shared with the designated health
information exchange as determined by policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board shall be provided in accordance with the
privacy and security provisions set forth in the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and regulations adopted under
the act.
(b) The operator may charge the health care facilities listed in
subdivision (c) of this subsection. A health care facility shall promptly
pay the charge as a condition of conducting business in the State of
Nebraska.
(c) (b) This subsection applies to an ambulatory surgical center, a
critical access hospital, a general acute hospital, a health clinic, a
hospital, an intermediate care facility, a long-term care hospital, a
mental health substance use treatment center, a PACE center, a pharmacy,
a psychiatric or mental hospital, a public health clinic, or a
-12-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
rehabilitation hospital, as such terms are defined in the Health Care
Facility Licensure Act, or a diagnostic, laboratory, or imaging center.
(d) (c) This subsection does not apply to (i) a state-owned or
state-operated facility or (ii) an assisted-living facility, a nursing
facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as such terms are defined in the
Health Care Facility Licensure Act.
(e) (d) Any connection established by July 1, 2021, between a health
care facility and the designated health information exchange to
facilitate such participation shall be at no cost to the participating
health care facility.
(f) (e) A health care facility may apply to the board for a waiver
from the requirement to participate under this subsection due to a
technological burden. The board shall review the application and
determine whether to waive the requirement. If the board waives the
requirement for a health care facility, the board shall review the waiver
annually to determine if the health care facility continues to qualify
for the waiver.
(g) (f) The board shall not require a health care facility to
purchase or contract for an electronic records management system or
service.
(4)(a) On or before January 1, 2022, each health insurance plan
shall participate in the designated health information exchange through
sharing of information. Subject to subsection (5) of this section, such
information shall be determined by policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board.
(b) The operator may charge the health insurance plans. A health
insurance plan shall promptly pay the charge as a condition of doing
business in the State of Nebraska.
(c) (b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Health insurance plan includes any group or individual sickness
and accident insurance policy, health maintenance organization contract,
-13-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
subscriber contract, employee medical, surgical, or hospital care benefit
plan, or self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by
federal law; and
(ii) Health insurance plan does not include (A) accident-only,
disability-income, hospital confinement indemnity, dental, hearing,
vision, or credit insurance, (B) coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance, (C) insurance provided as a supplement to medicare,
(D) insurance arising from workers' compensation provisions, (E)
automobile medical payment insurance, (F) insurance policies that provide
coverage for a specified disease or any other limited benefit coverage,
or (G) insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard
to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any
liability insurance policy.
(5) The designated health information exchange and the department
shall enter into an agreement to allow the designated health information
exchange to collect, aggregate, analyze, report, and release de-
identified data, as defined by the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, that is derived from the administration
of the medical assistance program. Such written agreement shall be
executed no later than September 30, 2021.
(6) In addition to the right to opt out as provided in section
71-2454, an individual shall have the right to opt out of the designated
health information exchange or the sharing of information required under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The designated health
information exchange shall adopt a patient opt-out policy consistent with
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996
and other applicable federal requirements. Such policy shall not apply to
mandatory public health reporting requirements.
Sec. 5. Section 81-6,126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,126 (1) The department shall work collaboratively with the
-14-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
designated health information exchange to access funding through federal
programs, which shall include, but not be limited to, the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention, and the Health Resources and Services Administration of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services, and other federal
programs related to health information, technology, population health,
and health care delivery system initiatives, for purposes of supporting
the designated health information exchange and the prescription drug
monitoring program.
(2) The department and the operator shall cooperate on
implementation of the assessment in section 6 of this act.
(3) (2) Nothing in the Population Health Information Act shall
preclude the department from working collaboratively with other entities
for purposes of collecting and analyzing data to inform the Legislature,
the department, health care providers, and health care entities regarding
the cost of, access to, and quality of health care in Nebraska.
Sec. 6. (1) Beginning July 1, 2025, the operator shall pay an
assessment on a quarterly basis. The department shall notify the operator
of the amount and due date of the assessments separately from any other
state or federal tax liabilities and as otherwise allowed by federal law.
The operator shall pay the quarterly assessment within sixty days after
receipt of notice of the assessment.
(2) The department shall determine the amount of each quarterly
assessment based on the most current understanding of nonfederal costs.
(3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to implement this section. The department shall include provisions for:
(a) Calculating and levying assessments upon the operator; and
(b) Providing protections for the operator against uncollected fees
and interest penalties for any outstanding debt.
(4) The department shall collect the assessment from the operator
and remit the assessment to the State Treasurer for credit to the
-15-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
Population Health Information Assessment Fund.
Sec. 7. (1) The Population Health Information Assessment Fund is
created. It is the intent of the Legislature that the fund be used to
provide for nonfederal costs and to reimburse the department for the cost
of collecting the assessment in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars annually.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that no transfers shall be
made from the fund to the General Fund.
(3) Any money in the Population Health Information Assessment Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings shall be credited to the
fund.
Sec. 8. The department shall report to the Health Information
Technology Board the compliance status of each managed care organization
operating in Nebraska regarding the sharing of claims information by June
30 of each fiscal year beginning in fiscal year 2025-26. Within sixty
days after receiving this status report, the board shall report to the
Department of Insurance the noncompliance status of managed care
organizations participating in the medical assistance program.
Sec. 9. The department shall share its vital statistics data files
with the designated health information exchange and the operator on the
first business day of January, April, July, and October. The designated
health information exchange and the operator shall then file a report
electronically with the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature regarding the return on investment of the designated health
information exchange and prescription drug monitoring program on or
before September 1 for the prior fiscal year.
Sec. 10. Original sections 81-6,123, 81-6,124, 81-6,125, and
81-6,126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 71-2454,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-16-

LB210 LB210
2025 2025
Sec. 11. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-17-